Hawaii statutes.
§621-5 Bystanders called without subpoena.
On the trial of any issue, matter or question, or on an inquiry arising in any
action or proceeding in any court or before any person having authority to
hear, receive, and examine evidence, any person who happens to be present, and
who by virtue of this chapter is competent to give evidence may be called and
required to give evidence and to produce any document. If any such person when
called and required as aforesaid, does not appear and give evidence and, if
then able so to do, produce the document, the person shall be subject to the
same proceedings and liabilities as if the person had been duly served with a
writ of subpoena ad testificandum or duces tecum. [L 1876, c 32, §12; RL 1925,
§2566; RL 1935, §3814; RL 1945, §9825; RL 1955, §222-5; HRS §621-5; am L 1972,
c 104, §1(c), (d); gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Power of court itself to call witness. 24 H. 689 (1919).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next